District of Columbia statutes.
31-2602.32

Repealed

Right to amend or repeal chapter.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 414, ch. 93, title XIII, § 32
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330
1981 Ed., § 35-1431.
1973 Ed., § 35-1132.